Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 Revenue Bonds

32-10-90.
Form and issuance of bonds; pledging of tolls and other project revenues.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized, at one time or from time to time, to provide by resolution for the issuance of negotiable revenue bonds of the authority for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost, as defined in paragraph (4) of Code Section 32-10-60, of any one or a combination of projects. The principal and interest of such revenue bonds shall be payable from and may be secured by a pledge of tolls and other revenues of all or any part of the project financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such issue or with the proceeds of bonds refunded or to be refunded by such issue or by a pledge of any other revenues of the authority that are legally available for such purpose. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest as provided for in Code Section 32-10-91, shall mature not later than 40 years from the date of issue, shall be payable in such media of payments as to both principal and interest as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 12; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 19; Code 1933, § 95A-1249, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-12.

Cross references.

Revenue bonds generally, §

36-82-60

et seq.

32-10-90.1.
Garvee bond provisions.

As used in this Code section, the term “grant anticipation revenue vehicle” or “garvee bond” means any bond issued by the authority which is an eligible debt financing instrument within the scope of 23 U.S.C. Section 122 or which is otherwise to be repaid or reimbursed in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, from federal funds.

With respect to garvee bonds and projects financed by garvee bonds, the provisions and limitations of this Code section shall control over any other conflicting provisions of this article, it being the intention of the General Assembly that grant anticipation revenue vehicles and projects funded thereby be fully subject to the terms expressed in this Code section.

For the purpose of issuance and use of the proceeds of garvee bonds, the authority and the department shall give priority, as far as reasonably practicable in the judgment of the department, to the completion of those portions of the Developmental Highway System as set out in paragraphs (1) through (13) and paragraphs (15) and (16) of subsection (a) of Code Section 32-4-22 and such further paragraphs as may be added to such subsection from time to time, with due regard to the timely and economical completion of the portion set out in paragraph (14) thereof.

Any project the cost of which is paid from the proceeds of garvee bonds shall be, pursuant to a contract or agreement between the authority and the department, planned, designed, and constructed by the Department of Transportation or a contractor contracting with the Department of Transportation.

If during any state fiscal year the amount of federal reimbursement available to the State of Georgia under 23 U.S.C. Section 122 is or will be reduced below 90 percent of the amount available during Fiscal Year 2000-2001, the authority shall not thereafter issue any garvee bond.

If cost effective as determined by the authority, garvee bonds shall be insured.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-10-90.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-12.1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, a comma was inserted following “garvee bonds” in subsection (c).

U.S. Code.

Payments to states for bond and other debt instrument financing,

23 U.S.C. § 122

.

32-10-91.
Obtaining of loans and issuance and sale of notes and bonds; sale of obligations.

The authority may authorize by resolution the following: the obtaining of loans; the issuance and sale of notes; and the issuance and sale of bonds. The foregoing obligations may be offered at public or private sale in such manner and for such interest rate and at such price as the authority may determine to be in the best interests of the authority and the state, provided that any offering is subject to the review and approval of the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 17 of Title 50.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 13; Code 1933, § 95A-1250, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 489, § 1.

32-10-92.
Bonds authorized by resolution; specification of terms; public or private sale.

Bonds issued by the authority shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, be in such denominations, bear such date or dates, and mature at such time or times within 40 years from the issuance thereof as the authority determines to be appropriate. Such bonds shall be subject to such terms of redemption, bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such times, be in registered form or book-entry form through a securities depository, or both, as to principal or interest or both principal and interest, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, and be subject to such terms and conditions as such resolution of the authority may provide; provided, however, in lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which the bonds to be issued by an authority are to bear, the resolution of the authority may provide that the bonds when issued will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest which may be fixed or may fluctuate or otherwise change from time to time as specified in the resolution or may state that, in the event the bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, none of such rates will exceed the maximum rate, which rate may be fixed or may fluctuate or otherwise change from time to time, as specified. Bonds may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices as the authority shall determine.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 14; Code 1933, § 95A-1251, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-13.

32-10-93.
Execution, seal, and signing of bonds.

All bonds issued by the authority shall be executed in the name of the authority by the chairperson and secretary of the authority and shall be sealed with the official seal of the authority or a facsimile thereof. The facsimile signatures of the chairperson and secretary of the authority may be imprinted thereon in lieu of the manual signatures of such officers if the authority so directs in the resolution authorizing such bonds or otherwise. In case any officer whose manual or facsimile signature shall appear on any bonds shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he or she had remained in office until such delivery.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 15; Code 1933, § 95A-1252, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-13.1.

32-10-94.
Bonds as negotiable instruments; tax exemption.

All revenue bonds issued under this article shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the state. Such bonds, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 16; Code 1933, § 95A-1253, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-95.
Utilization of bond proceeds; procedure in cases where proceeds are less than or greater than cost of project or combined projects.

The proceeds of the bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project or combined projects and shall be disbursed upon requisition or order of the chairman of the authority or its duly bonded agents under such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the project or combined projects, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit, which bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which such bonds are issued, all surplus shall be paid into the sinking fund provided for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 17; Code 1933, § 95A-1254, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-96.
Issuance of interim receipts, interim certificates, and temporary bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts, interim certificates, or temporary bonds, with or without coupons exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 18; Code 1933, § 95A-1255, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-97.
Replacement of lost or mutilated bonds.

The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bond which becomes mutilated or which is destroyed or lost.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 19; Code 1933, § 95A-1256, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-98.
Resolutions for bond issuance; issuance of bonds of a single issue.

Resolutions for the issuance of revenue bonds may be adopted without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this article. In the discretion of the authority, revenue bonds of a single issue may be issued for the purpose of paying the cost of any one or more, including a combination of, projects at any one location or any number of locations. Any resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds under this article shall become effective immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted; and any such resolution may be passed at any regular or special or adjourned meeting of the authority by a majority of its members.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 20; Code 1933, § 95A-1257, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-99.
Credit of state not pledged.

Revenue bonds issued under this article shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of Georgia or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, but such bonds shall be payable from the revenues and funds of the authority as provided for in the resolutions or trust indentures authorizing or securing such bond issues; and the issuance of such revenue bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatsoever therefor or to make any appropriation for the payment thereof; and all such bonds shall contain recitals on their face covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 21; Code 1933, § 95A-1258, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-13.2.

32-10-100.
Trust indenture as security for bonds.

In the discretion of the authority, any issue of such revenue bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company, inside or outside of the state. Such trust indenture may pledge or assign tolls, revenues, and earnings to be received by the authority.

Either the resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or such trust indenture may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholder, including the right of the appointment of a receiver upon default in the payment of any principal or interest obligation and the right of any receiver or indenture trustee to enforce collection of tolls, revenues, or other charges for the use of the project or projects, necessary to pay all costs of operation, all reserves provided for, the principal and interest on all bonds in the given issue, all cost of collection, and all other costs reasonably necessary to accomplish the collection of such sums, in the event of any default by the authority.

Such resolution or trust indenture may include covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property; the construction of the project; the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys; and the operation and maintenance of the project or projects; and may also provide that any project shall be constructed and paid for under the supervision of department engineers or others satisfactory to the original purchasers of the bonds issued for such project or projects. Such resolution or trust indenture may also require that the security given by contractors and by any depository of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues or other moneys be satisfactory to such purchasers and may also contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which additional revenue bonds may be issued.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depository and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. Such indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations.

In addition to the foregoing, such trust indenture may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project affected by such indenture.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 22; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 20; Code 1933, § 95A-1259, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32.

32-10-101.
Payment of bond proceeds to trustee.

The authority shall, in the resolution providing for issuance of revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds to any officer or person who or any agency, bank, or trust company which shall act as trustee of such funds and shall hold and apply such funds as provided in this article, subject to such regulations as this article and such resolution or trust indenture may provide.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 23; Code 1933, § 95A-1260, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-102.
Pledges of revenues, tolls, and earnings; creation and disposition of sinking funds.

The revenues, tolls, and earnings derived from any particular project or projects and all or any part of the revenues, tolls, and earnings received by the authority, regardless of whether or not such tolls, earnings, and revenues were produced by a particular project for which bonds have been issued, unless otherwise pledged or allocated, may be pledged by the authority to the payment of the principal and interest obligations of any revenue bond issues of the authority. All funds so pledged, from whatever source received, which may include funds received from one or more of all sources of the authority’s income, shall be set aside at regular intervals, as may be provided in the resolutions or trust indentures, into sinking funds which shall be pledged to and charged with the payment of (1) the interest upon such revenue bonds as such interest shall fall due, (2) the principal of the bonds as the same shall mature, (3) the necessary charges of paying agents for paying principal and interest, and (4) any premium required upon bonds retired by call or purchase as may be provided in the resolutions or trust indentures.

The use and disposition of such sinking funds shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolutions authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust indentures; but, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolutions or trust indentures, such sinking funds, individually, shall be funds for the benefit of all revenue bonds of the given issue for which they are created without distinction or priority of one over another. Subject to the resolution or trust indenture of any given bond issue, any moneys in such sinking funds, after all bonds and the interest thereon for which such sinking funds were pledged have been paid, may be paid into the authority fund provided for in Code Section 32-10-72.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 24; Code 1933, § 95A-1261, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-103.
Rights and remedies of holders of bonds or interest coupons and of indenture trustees.

Any holders of revenue bonds issued under this article or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, any duly appointed receiver of such bonds or coupons, and any indenture trustee for bondholders, except to the extent the rights given in this Code section may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of Georgia or granted in this Code section or under such resolution or trust indentures and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this article or by such resolution or trust indenture to be performed by the authority or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collection of revenues, tolls, and other charges for the use of the project or projects. No holder of any such bond or receiver or indenture trustee thereof shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state to pay any such bond or the interest thereon or to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state; nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 25; Code 1933, § 95A-1262, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.

32-10-104.
Refunding bonds.

The authority is authorized, subject to any prior resolution or trust indenture, to provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds issued under this article and then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon. The issuance of such revenue refunding bonds, the maturities and all other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the authority in respect to the same shall be governed by this article insofar as the same may be applicable.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 26; Code 1933, § 95A-1263, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-105.
Investment of funds in bonds; deposit of bonds as securities.

The bonds authorized in paragraph (8) of Code Section 32-10-63 and in Code Section 32-10-90 are deemed securities in which (1) all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and all municipal subdivisions, (2) all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, (3) all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, (4) all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and (5) all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are also deemed securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of the bonds or other obligations of this state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 27; Code 1933, § 95A-1264, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-106.
Protection of interests and rights of bondholders.

While any of the bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence of the authority or of its officers, employees, or agents shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of such bonds.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 31; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 21; Code 1933, § 95A-1268, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-107.
Confirmation and validation of bonds.

Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36, the “Revenue Bond Law.” The petition for validation for conduit bonds issued pursuant to paragraph (8) of Code Section 32-10-63 shall also make any person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or other type of private entity a party defendant to such action, if such person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or other type of private entity has contracted or will contract with the authority to provide funds for the repayment of revenue bonds which are to be issued and are sought to be validated. The bonds, when validated, and the judgment of validation shall be final and conclusive with respect to the validity of such bonds and against the authority and against all other persons or entities, regardless of whether such persons or entities were parties to such validation proceedings.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 30; Code 1933, § 95A-1267, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 760, § 6/SB 183; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 9/HB 577.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36, the ‘Revenue Bond Law.’ The bonds, when validated, and the judgment of validation shall be final and conclusive with respect to such bonds and against the authority issuing the same.”.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence, inserted “for conduit bonds issued pursuant to paragraph (8) of Code Section 32-10-63” near the beginning, inserted “contracted” near the middle, substituted “to provide funds for the repayment of” for “with respect to the project for which” in the middle, and inserted “which” near the end.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

32-10-108.
Transfer of projects to state highway system free from tolls.

Upon payment in full of all bonds and the interest thereon and obligations of every nature whatsoever for the payment of which the revenues of any given project or projects have been pledged, in whole or in part, either originally or subsequently, either primarily or secondarily, directly or indirectly or otherwise, or upon the setting aside in trust, for the benefit of bondholders or other obligees, of a sufficient amount for the payment of all such bonds and other obligations and the interest thereon to the maturity thereof, such project or projects, if deemed by the department to be in a safe and satisfactory condition of repair and traffic capacity, may become part of the state highway system and thereafter shall be maintained by the department free of tolls. In the event such project or projects to be transferred are not in good condition, in the judgment of the department, the department shall be charged with the duty of immediately advising the authority in writing what will be necessary to accomplish such safe and satisfactory condition of repair and traffic capacity; and the authority thereafter shall apply sufficient revenue from such project or projects to the accomplishment of such safe condition of repair and traffic capacity; and, upon its accomplishment, such project or projects shall become toll free as provided in this Code section. Upon the fulfillment of all conditions necessary to the cessation of tolls upon any such project, the authority shall convey by deed all right, title, and interest in and to such project to the department for and in consideration of $1.00, which the treasurer of the department is authorized to pay from any department funds available to him for any department expenditure.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 9; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 16; Code 1933, § 95A-1246, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-14.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, “Upon payment in full” was substituted for “Upon payment if full” at the beginning of the Code section.

32-10-109.
Covenant with holders as to tax-exempt status of authority property and bonds.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purpose are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the authority is an institution of purely public charity and will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this article; and this state covenants with the holders of the bonds that the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired or leased by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the projects erected by it or upon any fees, tolls, or other charges for the use of such projects or upon other income received by the authority. The bonds of the authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within this state. The tax exemption provided for in this chapter shall include an exemption from sales and use tax on property purchased by the authority or for use by the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 28; Code 1933, § 95A-1265, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1058, § 3/SB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “are” was substituted for “is” near the beginning of this Code section.

32-10-110.
Venue and jurisdiction of actions.

Any action to protect or enforce any rights under this article and any action pertaining to validation of any bonds issued under this article brought in the courts of this state shall be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County, which shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of such actions.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 29; Code 1933, § 95A-1266, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.